Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3294
Basic health care services, defined.

Basic health care services shall include as a minimum the following medically necessary services: Preventive care; emergency care; inpatient and outpatient hospital and physician care; diagnostic laboratory services; diagnostic and therapeutic radiological services; and out-of-area emergency services.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 3.